California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
Any record or report which is made to the director pursuant to this article, or any contract required to be filed pursuant to this chapter, is confidential and shall not be divulged, except if necessary for the proper determination of any court proceeding or hearing before the director.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 156, Sec. 22.   Effective July 10, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Investigations and Hearings [61471. - 61478.]

61471.

The director may, upon his or her own motion or upon the receipt of any verified complaint, investigate any transaction that involves the violation of any provision of this chapter by any person. The director may call and conduct a hearing in furtherance of that investigation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 187, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

61472.

If a hearing is called by the director, the director shall cause a copy of the complaint, together with a notice of time and place of hearing of the complaint, to be served personally or by mail upon that person. Service shall be made at least 10 days before the hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 187, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

61473.

The hearing shall be held in the city or place in which is situated the business location of the person that is complained of, or in which the transaction complained of is said to have occurred.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

61474.

The person complained of shall, at least three days prior to the date fixed for the hearing, serve upon the complaining party and file with the director a verified answer to all the allegations which are contained in the complaint.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

61475.

At the time and place which is appointed for such hearing the director shall hear the parties to such complaint, and shall enter in the office of the director at Sacramento a decision dismissing such complaint or specifying the facts which are established on such hearing. A copy of such decision shall be furnished to each of the respective parties to it.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

61476.

The director may do any of the following:

(a) Administer oaths and take testimony thereunder.

(b) Issue subpoenas which require the attendance of witnesses before him, together with all books, memoranda, papers, and other documents, articles, or instruments.

(c) Compel the disclosure by such witnesses of all facts which are known to them relative to the matters under investigation.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

61477.

Any party that disobeys any order or subpoena of the director is guilty of contempt and shall be certified to the superior court of the state, in and for the county wherein such contempt occurs, for punishment for such contempt in accordance with Sections 11180 to 11191, inclusive, of the Government Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

61478.

Any act of the director pursuant to any provision of this chapter may be reviewed by any court of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Manufacturing Milk Handler Licenses [61490. - 61494.]

61490.

For the purposes of this article, each subsidiary manufacturing milk plant, or branch manufacturing milk plant, whether under one ownership or not, shall be considered as an individual manufacturing milk handler.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 446, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

61491.

“Manufacturing milk handler” means any person defined as a manufacturing milk handler pursuant to Section 61402.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 446, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

61492.

It is unlawful for a manufacturing milk handler who is not licensed under Article 12 (commencing with Section 62141) of Chapter 2 to handle manufacturing milk without first obtaining a manufacturing milk handler’s license pursuant to this article. In addition, pursuant to Section 61490, any handler shall obtain a separate license for each milk plant owned or operated. The license provided for in this article is in addition to any license which is required by Division 15 (commencing with Section 32501), or by any law or ordinance of any county or municipality of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 446, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

61493.

Application for the license provided by this article shall be made on forms prescribed by the director, accompanied by an application fee as prescribed in Section 61494, and state the name and address of the applicant and any details specifically related to the nature of the applicant’s business that the director may require. The applicant shall further satisfy the director of his or her character, responsibility, and good faith in seeking to carry on the business stated in the application.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 534, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

61494.

One-half of the valid license renewals shall be issued for a period of 24 months beginning January 1, 1988. The application fee for the renewal of the 24-month license shall be twenty-five dollars ($25).

The remaining valid license renewals shall be issued for a period of 12 months beginning January 1, 1988. The application fee for the renewal of the 12-month license shall be twelve dollars and fifty cents ($12.50).

Beginning January 1, 1989, all renewals of licenses shall be issued for a 24-month period, and shall be twenty-five dollars ($25).

Except as otherwise provided, beginning January 1, 1988, every new license issued shall expire on the 31st day of December of the following year.

Application for a new license or a renewal license, together with the appropriate application fee, shall be made prior to the handling of manufacturing milk or the expiration date of the license held. If it is not so made, the applicant shall pay an additional twenty-five dollars ($25) before the license shall be issued.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 534, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Disposition and Use of Funds [61531. - 61531.]

61531.

All money received by the director pursuant to this chapter shall be paid monthly into the State Treasury to the credit of the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund. Funds which are so collected may only be used to defray the expenses in connection with the administration of this chapter, Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 61801), and Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 62500).

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1074, Sec. 12.   Effective September 24, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Actions and Penalties [61571. - 61573.]

61571.

The violation of any provisions of this chapter is a misdemeanor which is punishable by a fine not less than one hundred dollars ($100) and not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment in a county jail not exceeding six months, or by both such fine and imprisonment. The amount of penalty which is assessed pursuant to this section on each count of violation shall be based upon the nature of the violation and the seriousness of the effect of such violation upon effectuation of the purposes and provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 127.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

61572.

Any person who violates this chapter, or any regulations adopted under this chapter, is liable civilly in an amount not less than one hundred dollars ($100) and not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each and every violation, that sum to be recovered by the director in any court of competent jurisdiction. The amount of penalty which is assessed pursuant to this section on each count of violation shall be based upon the nature of the violation and the seriousness of the effect of the violation upon effectuation of the purposes and provisions of this chapter. The court may, in addition to the civil penalty, award reasonably incurred investigative and enforcement costs, and attorney’s fees, to the director. The court may also award attorney’s fees to any person successfully defending a civil action under this section. In any civil action initiated by the director under this section, the director shall join in the action, and assert civil penalties against, all parties participating in the commission of the unlawful practice. Any sum which is recovered under this section shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 522, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

61573.

The director may bring an action to enjoin the violation or the threatened violation of any provision of this chapter or of any order which is made pursuant to this chapter in the superior court in the county in which such violation occurs or is about to occur. There may be enjoined in one proceeding any number of defendants alleged to be violating the same provisions or orders, although their properties, interests, residences, or places of business may be in several counties and the violations separate and distinct. Any proceeding which is brought pursuant to this section shall be governed in all other respects by the provisions of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 525), Title 7, Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Stabilization and Marketing of Market Milk [61801. - 62403.]



  ARTICLE 1. Legislative Declarations [61801. - 61812.]

61801.

The production of market milk is hereby declared to be a business affected with a public interest. The provisions of this chapter are enacted in the exercise of the police powers of this state for the purpose of protecting the health and welfare of the people of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 751, Sec. 21.)
-------------------------------------------

61802.

The Legislature hereby declares all of the following:

(a) Market milk is a necessary article of food for human consumption.

(b) The production and maintenance of an adequate supply of healthful market milk of proper chemical and physical content, free from contamination, is vital to the public health and welfare, and the production, transportation, processing, and storage of market milk in this state is an industry affecting the public health.

(c) Because of the perishable quality of milk, the nature of milk production, the varying seasonal production and demand factors, and other economic factors affecting the milk industry, the potential exists for economic disruption, in the absence of regulation, in the production, marketing, and sale of market milk which may constitute a menace to the health and welfare of the inhabitants of this state and may tend to undermine sanitary regulations and standards of content and purity, however effectually the sanitary regulations may be enforced.

(d) Health regulations alone are insufficient to prevent economic disturbances in the production of milk which may disrupt the future supply of market milk and to safeguard the consuming public from future inadequacy of a supply of this necessary commodity.

(e) It is the policy of this state to promote, foster, and encourage the intelligent production and orderly marketing of commodities necessary to its citizens, including market milk, and to eliminate economic waste, destructive trade practices, and improper accounting for market milk purchased from producers.

(f) It is recognized by the Legislature that the economic factors concerning the production, marketing, and sale of market milk in California may be affected by the national market for milk for manufacturing purposes.

(g) It is recognized by the Legislature that in recent years the supply of manufacturing milk in California, as defined in Section 32509, has consistently declined and continues to decline, and that market milk has virtually supplanted manufacturing milk for manufacturing purposes in this state, and that it is therefore necessary to conform the pricing standards governing minimum producer prices for market milk established under this chapter to current economic conditions.

(h) It is recognized by the Legislature that the levels of retail prices of milk and milk products paid by consumers are affected by a large number of economic and other factors apart from minimum producer prices for market milk established under this chapter, many of which factors are not within the power of the director to regulate or control, particularly since the Legislature repealed provisions concerning establishment of minimum wholesale and retail prices. It is further recognized by the Legislature that, in order to accomplish the purposes of this chapter and to promote the public health and welfare, it is essential to establish minimum producer prices at fair and reasonable levels so as to generate reasonable producer incomes that will promote the intelligent and orderly marketing of market milk in the various classes, and that minimum producer prices established under this chapter should not be unreasonably depressed because other factors have affected the levels of retail prices paid by consumers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1112, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

61803.

It is recognized by the Legislature that conditions within the milk industry of this state are such that it is necessary to establish marketing areas wherein different prices and regulations are necessary, and for that purpose the director shall have the administrative authority, with such additional duties as are herein prescribed, after investigation and public hearing, to prescribe such marketing areas and modify the same when advisable or necessary.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

61804.

The foregoing statements in this article of facts, policy, and application of this chapter are hereby declared a matter of legislative determination.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

61805.

The purposes of this chapter are to do all of the following:

(a) Provide funds for administration and enforcement of this chapter, by assessments to be paid by producers and handlers of market milk in the manner prescribed in this chapter.

(b) Authorize and enable the secretary to prescribe marketing areas and to determine minimum prices to be paid to producers by handlers for market milk that are necessary due to varying factors of costs of production, health regulations, transportation, and other factors in the marketing areas of this state. In determining minimum prices to be paid producers by handlers, the
 secretary shall endeavor under like conditions to achieve uniformity of cost to handlers for market milk within any marketing area. However, no minimum prices established or determined under this chapter shall be invalid because uniformity of cost to handlers for market milk in any marketing area is not achieved as a result of the minimum producer prices so established or determined.

(c) Authorize and enable the secretary to formulate stabilization and marketing plans, subject to the limitations prescribed in this chapter with respect to the contents of the stabilization and marketing plans, and to declare the plans in effect for any marketing area.

(d) Enable the dairy industry, with the aid of the state, to develop and maintain satisfactory marketing conditions, bring about
 and maintain a reasonable amount of stability and prosperity in the production of market milk, and provide means for conducting educational and research activities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 260, Sec. 8.   (AB 1894)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

61806.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the powers conferred in this chapter shall be liberally construed.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

61807.

Nothing in this chapter permits or authorizes the development of conditions of monopoly in the production of market milk. In the establishment of the terms and conditions under which market milk shall be purchased from producers, the terms and conditions are those which will, in the several localities and markets of the state, and under the varying conditions of production, insure an adequate and continuous supply of pure, fresh, wholesome market milk to consumers of the market milk.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 751, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

61808.

The Legislature hereby declares that this chapter is intended to formulate a comprehensive scheme for the regulation of marketing milk. If, however, any provision of, or addition or amendment to, this chapter, either as originally enacted in 1935 at the 51st Regular Session of the California Legislature, or as amended, added to, recodified, or reenacted at any subsequent session of the California Legislature, should be held to be unconstitutional, the unconstitutionality of such provision does not affect any other provision of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

61809.

If any article, section, subdivision, sentence, clause, or phrase of any provision of this chapter is for any reason held to be unconstitutional, such decision does not affect the validity of the remaining provisions of this chapter. The Legislature hereby declares that it would have enacted each article, section, subdivision, sentence, clause, or phrase of this chapter irrespective of the fact that one or more other articles, sections, subdivisions, sentences, clauses, or phrases is declared unconstitutional.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

61810.

Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 61301), Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 62500), and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 62700) shall be liberally construed as being complementary of, and supplemental to, this chapter, and these chapters shall constitute a single comprehensive scheme for the regulation of the production and handling of market milk. However, each of the chapters, and each article, section, subdivision, sentence, clause, and phrase of each chapter is severable.

If one of the chapters or any article, section, subdivision, sentence, clause, or phrase of any one of the chapters is for any reason held void, invalid, or unconstitutional, the decision shall not affect the validity of the other chapter or any of its articles, sections, subdivisions, sentences, clauses, or phrases.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1074, Sec. 13.   Effective September 24, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

61811.

No provision of this chapter, or of any stabilization and marketing plan formulated by the director pursuant to this chapter, is any limitation upon the right of any handler or producer-handler including any nonprofit cooperative association of producers which association is also a handler, by reason of the form or nature of the legal entity under which such handler conducts business, to sell or handle market milk, or any dairy product at prices or upon terms and conditions according to, and within, the several methods of handling, at or subject to which the market milk or dairy product lawfully may be sold or handled by any other handler.

This section does not make lawful or permit the payment by any such handler to a producer for market milk of prices less than the minimum prices prescribed in the applicable stabilization and marketing plan.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

61812.

Neither the repeal of former Chapter 2 of this part, the reenactment of this chapter nor the amendment of any provision of this chapter shall have the effect of terminating or invalidating any stabilization and marketing plan, including provisions thereunder regarding minimum prices to be paid producers for market milk, established by the director pursuant to this chapter or former Chapter 2 prior to the effective date of the repeal, enactment, or amendment. The director shall, however, establish minimum prices pursuant to the provisions of the enactment, or amendment at the earliest practicable date after the effective date of the amendment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 383, Sec. 1.   Effective July 26, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [61821. - 61839.]

61821.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

61822.

“Board” means any advisory board created as authorized in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

61823.

“Bulk market milk” means market milk which has not been pasteurized or packaged in bottles, cartons, dispenser cans, or other consumer packages, and is handled or delivered, in bulk, in tanks, cans, or other bulk containers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

61824.

“Consumer” means any person that purchases market milk, or any dairy product for consumption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

61825.

“Dairy product” or “milk product” includes any product manufactured from milk or any derivative or product of milk.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

61826.

“Handler” means any person who, as owner, agent, broker, or intermediary, either directly or indirectly, receives, purchases, or otherwise acquires ownership, possession, or control of market milk in unprocessed or bulk form from a producer, a producer-handler, or another handler for the purpose of manufacture, processing, sale, or other handling, regardless of whether such market milk is produced within or outside this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

61827.

“Market cream” means cream, as defined in this code, and any combination of cream and milk, or any fluid product of milk or cream sold under any trade name whatsoever, which complies with all of the following requirements:

(a) Is not packaged in hermetically sealed containers.

(b) Conforms to the health and sanitary regulations of the place where it is sold or disposed of for human consumption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

61828.

“Market milk” has the meaning of that term as defined in Section 32510 and has the same meaning as “restricted use market milk” as defined in Section 32516.5. Unless the context otherwise indicates, “market milk” includes market cream, the components and derivatives of market milk, and dairy products manufactured from market milk or its components and derivatives.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 759, Sec. 22.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

61829.

“Market skim milk” means skim milk, as defined in this code, that is derived from market milk and conforms to the health and sanitary regulations of the place where sold or disposed of for human consumption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

61830.

“Marketing area” is any area within this state declared to be such in the manner that is prescribed in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

61831.

“Milk” has the meaning of that term as defined in Section 32511.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

61831.5.

“Milk used for manufacturing purposes” means all milk used for those products defined in Part 3 (commencing with Section 36601) of Division 15.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

61832.

“Milk plant” means any place, structure, or building where a handler receives market milk.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 373.)
-------------------------------------------

61833.

“Packaged market milk” or “packaged market cream” means market milk or market cream respectively, which is packaged in cartons, bottles, dispenser cans, or other consumer packages, for sale to wholesale customers, or consumers.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

61834.

“Person” means any individual, firm, corporation, partnership, limited liability company, trust, incorporated or unincorporated association, nonprofit cooperative association, nonprofit corporation, or any other business unit or organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 130.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

61835.

“Processing” means receiving, pasteurizing, and packaging market milk. It includes the manufacturing of milk products from market milk.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

61836.

“Producer” means any person that produces market milk from five or more cows in conformity with the applicable health regulations of the place in which it is sold, and whose bulk market milk is received, acquired, or handled by any handler or any nonprofit association of producers. It includes the nonprofit cooperative associations described in Article 3 (commencing with Section 61871) of this chapter in the transactions in which such article provides that the associations are producers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

61837.

“Producer-handler” means any person that is both a producer and a handler of market milk. For the purposes of this chapter a producer-handler is a producer in any transaction which involves the sale or delivery of bulk market milk which was produced by him to a handler or to any nonprofit cooperative association of producers, and is a handler in any transaction which involves the purchase, acquisition or receipt by him of market milk, the pasteurization or packaging of market milk, or the sale or delivery of packaged market milk to any person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

61838.

“Stabilization and marketing plan” means any plan formulated and made effective by the director within the legislative standards provided by this chapter. It includes, among other things, the establishing of prices to be paid by handlers for any or all of the various classes of market milk.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

61839.

“Wholesale customer” means any person except a distributor that buys packaged milk, cream, or any dairy product for resale to consumers or to other wholesale customers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 751, Sec. 27.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Nonprofit Cooperative Associations [61871. - 61873.]

61871.

For the purposes of this chapter, a nonprofit cooperative association organized and existing under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 54001) of Division 20, that acts for producers, including members and any nonmembers of the association, to whom it accounts on a patronage basis, is a producer in any of the following transactions:

(a) Any transaction which involves its receipt or handling of bulk market milk produced or delivered by such producers.

(b) Any transaction which involves the sale or delivery of bulk market milk to any producer, handler, or manufacturer, or other nonprofit cooperative association of producers.

(c) The receipt by it of payment for bulk market milk, packaged market milk, or any other product of market milk produced or delivered by such producers.

(d) Any transaction in connection with accounting to such producers for the proceeds derived from the sale or marketing of bulk market milk, packaged market milk, or any other product of market milk produced or delivered by such producers.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

61872.

For the purposes of this chapter, a nonprofit cooperative association organized and existing under Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 54001) of Division 20, that acts for producers, including members and any nonmembers of the association, to whom it accounts on a patronage basis, is a handler in any transaction which involves the receipt by it of market milk from any person other than a producer to whom it accounts on a patronage basis and in any transaction which involves the pasteurization of bulk market milk or the packaging of it in bottles, cartons, dispenser cans, or other consumer packages, or the sale or delivery of packaged market milk.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

61873.

A nonprofit cooperative association accounts to producers on a patronage basis when it accounts to each producer for his share of the net proceeds derived from the marketing operations of the association, according to quantity and quality of market milk furnished to the association for marketing and according to any marketing pools and quotas established by the association.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Administration [61891. - 61904.]

61891.

The director shall enforce the provisions of this chapter and of any stabilization and marketing plan initiated pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. The director shall adopt those regulations necessary for the proper administration and enforcement of the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

61892.

The director shall have and may exercise any or all the powers conferred by the Government Code upon the head of a department of the state with respect to hearings and investigations under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

61893.

The director is the instrumentality of this state for the purpose of administering and enforcing the provisions of this chapter and to execute the legislative intent expressed in this chapter, and is hereby vested with the administrative authority described in this chapter. Notwithstanding other laws to the contrary, in the event a milk marketing order under the jurisdiction of the United States Department of Agriculture or other appropriate federal agency, is created by referendum or under the applicable laws and procedures relating thereto, in this state or in any geographical area within this state, the provisions of this chapter or any part thereof which is in conflict with such federal order, or which is unnecessary or is a duplication thereof, shall be suspended in the geographical area covered by and during the existence of such federal order. The director shall take such steps and procedures as are necessary to wind up and conclude the administration and enforcement of the provisions of this chapter, or any part thereof, for the period prior to the suspension date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

61894.

For the purposes of enforcing this chapter, the director may investigate any and all transactions, between producers and handlers, between nonprofit cooperative associations and producers, among handlers, or between handlers and wholesale customers, among wholesale customers, between handlers and consumers, or between wholesale customers and consumers. For that purpose, the director shall have access to, and may enter at all reasonable hours, any place where market milk is being stored, bottled, or manufactured, where market milk or any market milk product is being bought, sold, or handled, or where the books, papers, records, or documents which relate to those transactions are kept. He may inspect and copy those books, papers, records, or documents in any place within the state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 751, Sec. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

61895.

The director may require the registration of producers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

61896.

The director may formulate any stabilization and marketing plan as prescribed in this chapter and declare it effective after public hearing and reasonable notice by mail or otherwise to all producers, handlers, and consumer organizations who have filed requests with the director or the Director of Consumer Affairs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

61897.

A full and accurate record of business or acts performed, or of testimony taken, by the director pursuant to this chapter shall be kept and placed on file in the office of the director.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

61898.

In addition to the compilation of information which pertains to market milk from the reports required by this chapter, the director shall collect, assemble, compile, and distribute statistical data relative to market milk, other milk and milk products, and such other information as may relate to the dairy industry and the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

61899.

Any order of the director made pursuant to this chapter which substantially affects the rights of any interested party may be reviewed by any court of competent jurisdiction. Any such action shall be commenced within 30 days after the effective date of the order complained of, or within 30 days after the injurious effect complained of becomes reasonably apparent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

61900.

The director may confer, enter into agreements, or otherwise arrange with the constituted authorities of this state, other states, or agencies of the United States with respect to plans which relate to the stabilization and distribution of market milk within this state or as between this state and other states or the United States, and may exercise his powers pursuant to this chapter to effectuate and enforce such plans.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

61901.

All money received by the director pursuant to this chapter shall be paid monthly into the State Treasury to the credit of the Department of Food and Agriculture Fund. Funds which are so collected may only be used to defray expenses in connection with the administration of this chapter, Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 61301), and Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 62500).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1074, Sec. 14.   Effective September 24, 1987.)
-------------------------------------------

61902.

If the director determines that it is probable that one or more factors or conditions which affect prices of market milk have changed on a relatively uniform basis throughout two or more marketing areas, he may consolidate the hearings on the matter of price changes for such areas. No price change shall be made as a result of such a consolidated hearing unless the amount of the change or the resulting prices are uniform throughout the areas which are affected.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

61903.

Any person who has testified under oath at a public hearing held by the director pursuant to this chapter may be granted, upon request prior to the close of the hearing, a period of time not to exceed 10 calendar days following the closing date of the public hearing, in which to file with the director a written posthearing brief in amplification, explanation, or withdrawal of that person’s testimony. Any such posthearing brief shall be made available by the director to any interested person for inspection. Except as herein provided, the director, in formulating any stabilization and marketing plan, pursuant to this chapter, following a public hearing, shall not accept or consider any posthearing brief. Nothing in this section shall require the director to prepare, or to make available, any verbatim transcript or other record or summary of the hearing within the 10-calendar-day period referred to in this section. However, any verbatim transcript or other record or summary of the hearing prepared for or by the director shall be made available to any interested party for inspection at the office of the director in Sacramento and, upon reasonable request, at the regional office of the director nearest the location at which the public hearing was held.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 261, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

61904.

Any provisions of a stabilization and marketing plan formulated, established, or rejected by the director pursuant to this chapter, shall be accompanied by written statements, which shall be made available by the director to any interested person upon request, stating in substance the considerations upon which such plan provisions and minimum prices are based, or upon which such provisions and prices were rejected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Classes of Market Milk [61931. - 61937.]

61931.

Market milk may be classified for the purposes of this chapter as provided in this article.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1192.)
-------------------------------------------

61932.

Class 1 comprises:

(a) Any market milk, market skim milk, half-and-half, or concentrated milk that is supplied to consumers in the fluid state, with the exception of the following:

(1) (A) Any UHT market milk product, as defined in Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 39701) of Part 3 of Division 15, that is sold for use outside the state.

(B) Any market milk products that are ultrapasteurized and sold for use outside the 48 contiguous states in the United States.

(2) Any market half-and-half that is ultrapasteurized and packaged in hermetically sealed containers.

(3) Any market half-and-half that is packaged in presterilized containers under aseptic conditions to meet the marketing requirements for these products in states other than this state. However, this paragraph does not authorize the sale within this state of any milk product as a UHT product unless the product meets the standards and requirements for UHT products specified in Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 39701) of Part 3 of Division 15.
